Mississippi, session 2026, HB59.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. Nurse practitioners and registered nurses licensed by the Mississippi Board of Nursing shall be authorized to administer fluids containing vitamins for the purpose of improving a person's immune health through intravenous (IV) therapy in a clinical setting.  There is no limit on the number of vitamins that may be administered through IV therapy by a nurse practitioner or registered nurse at any one time, and the vitamins administered through IV therapy by a nurse practitioner or registered nurse do not have to be prepared by a compound pharmacy. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.